California statutes. Labor Code
(a) Any person engaged in the business of garment manufacturing who contracts with any other person similarly engaged who has not registered with the commissioner or does not have a valid bond on file with the commissioner, as required by Section 2675, shall be deemed an employer, and shall be jointly liable with such other person for any violation of Section 2675 and the sections enumerated in that section.

(b) Any employee of a person or persons engaged in garment manufacturing who are not registered as required by this part may bring a civil action against any person deemed to be an employer pursuant to subdivision (a) to recover any wages, damages, or penalties to which the employee may be entitled because of a violation by the unregistered person or persons of any provision specified in subdivision (a) of Section 2675, or may file a claim with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 2673.1. In any civil action brought pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall grant a prevailing plaintiff’s reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 554, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2677.5.

It shall be illegal for any person registered pursuant to this chapter and contracting with another registrant to engage in any business practice which causes or is likely to cause a violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1564, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2678.

(a) A penalty, as provided in subdivision (c), may be imposed against any person for any of the following:

(1) Failure to comply within 15 days of any judgment due for violation of any labor laws applicable to garment industry workers.

(2) Failure to comply with the registration requirements of this part.

(3) Failure to comply with Section 2673 or any section enumerated in Section 2675.

(b) The order imposing the penalty may be served personally or by registered mail in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 11505 of the Government Code. The order shall be in writing and shall describe the nature of the violation, including reference to the statutory provisions, rules, or regulations alleged to have been violated.

(c) The penalties shall be a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each affected employee for the initial violation and a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) for each affected employee for the second or subsequent violation. 

(d) If a person is subject to civil penalties for a violation described in subdivision (a), but does not employ one or more workers, the civil penalty shall be five hundred dollars ($500), and the person shall not be guilty of a misdemeanor as specified in Section 2676.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 276, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2679.

(a) The commissioner, in addition to any civil penalty imposed pursuant to Section 2679, may require that as a condition of continued registration, such employer deposit with him or her within 10 days a bond to ensure payment of wages and benefits in such sum and form as the commissioner may deem sufficient and adequate in the circumstances but not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The bond shall be payable to the commissioner and shall provide that the employer shall pay his or her employees in accordance with the provisions of Section 2675. In lieu of the deposit of a bond, the commissioner, in his or her discretion, may accept other evidence of financial security sufficient to guarantee payment of wages to affected employees.

(b) The commissioner, in addition to any civil penalty imposed, shall require a bond as set forth in subdivision (a) upon any second or subsequent violation within any two-year period. The commissioner may revoke the registration of any person for any period ranging from 30 days to one year upon a third or subsequent violation within any two-year period and may confiscate any garment or wearing apparel, assembled or partially assembled, if the violation relates to minimum wages, child labor, or maximum hours of labor. If the commissioner does exercise the authority to confiscate upon such a third or subsequent violation, the commissioner shall notify persons for whom assembly is performed and shall provide for the return of such garment owner’s confiscated garments or wearing apparel upon such assumption and satisfaction of liability for the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

2680.

(a) Any garment or wearing apparel, assembled or partially assembled by or on behalf of any person who has not complied with the registration requirements of this part, may be confiscated by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement. Garments and wearing apparel confiscated pursuant to this section shall be placed in the custody of the division, which shall be charged with the responsibility of destroying or disposing of them pursuant to regulations adopted under Section 2672, provided that the goods shall not enter the mainstream of commerce and shall not be offered for sale. The division shall, by registered mail and telephone, give notice of the removal and the location where the confiscated goods are held in custody to the known manufacturer and contractor.

(b) If the person from whom garments or wearing apparel are confiscated pursuant to subdivision (a) was providing the confiscated garments or wearing apparel as a contractor and has previously, within the immediately preceding five-year period, had garments or wearing apparel confiscated pursuant to subdivision (a), the Labor Commissioner may, in addition to the remedies set forth in subdivision (a), confiscate the means of production, including all manufacturing equipment and the property where the current unregistered garment manufacturing operations have taken place. This subdivision does not apply where nonregistration of the contractor was due to delayed renewal of registration.

(c) The proceeds from the sale of any equipment or property under subdivision (b) shall be deposited into a single account in the General Fund, to be known as the Back Wages and Taxes Account. At the Labor Commissioner’s discretion, and upon appropriation by the Legislature, funds from that account may be disbursed to pay back wages owed to garment workers, including, but not limited to, workers of the unregistered contractor whose violation caused the confiscation, and for the payment of taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 554, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2680.5.

The commissioner shall have the authority to investigate and mediate pricing and quality disputes arising out of written contracts between manufacturers and contractors in the garment industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1564, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2681.

(a) Any person against whom a penalty is assessed or whose goods are confiscated shall, in lieu of contesting the penalty or the confiscation pursuant to this section, transmit to the office of the Labor Commissioner designated on the citation the amount specified for the violation within 15 business days after the issuance of the citation.

(b) If a person desires to contest an assessment of a penalty or the confiscation of goods, he or she shall, within 15 business days after service of the citation or confiscation of the goods, or both, petition, in writing, the office of the Labor Commissioner which appears on the citation or on the receipt for the confiscated goods of his or her request for an informal hearing. The Labor Commissioner or his or her deputy or agent shall, within 30 days, hold a hearing at the conclusion of which the penalty set forth in the citation or the issue of the confiscation of the goods, or both, shall be affirmed, modified, or dismissed. If confiscated goods are involved, the hearing shall be held within 10 days. The decision of the Labor Commissioner shall consist of a notice of findings, findings, and order which shall be served on all parties to the hearing within 15 days after the hearing by regular first-class mail at the last known address of the party on file with the Labor Commissioner. Service shall be completed pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Any amount found due by the Labor Commissioner as a result of a hearing shall become due and payable 45 days after notice of the findings and written findings and order have been mailed to the party assessed. A writ of mandate may be taken from this finding to the appropriate superior court, as long as the party agrees to pay any judgment and costs ultimately rendered by the court against the party for the assessment. The writ must be taken within 45 days of service of the notice of findings, findings, and order thereon.

(c) When no petition objecting to a citation or the proposed assessment of a civil penalty or confiscation of goods, or both, is filed, a certified copy of the citation or proposed civil penalty may be filed by the Labor Commissioner in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the person assessed has property or in which the person assessed has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon the filing, shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the citation or proposed assessment of a civil penalty.

(d) When findings and the order thereon are made affirming or modifying a citation or proposed assessment of a civil penalty after hearing, a certified copy of these findings and the order entered thereon may be entered by the Labor Commissioner in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the person assessed has property or in which the person assessed has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon the filing, shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the certified order.

(e) A judgment entered pursuant to this section shall bear the same rate of interest and shall have the same effect as other judgments and be given the same preference allowed by law on other judgments rendered for claims for taxes. The clerk shall make no charge for the service provided by this section to be performed by him or her.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 96, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

2682.

Moneys recovered under this chapter shall be applied first to payment of wages due affected employees. If insufficient funds are withheld or recovered, the money shall be prorated among all such workers. Any remainder shall be paid to the General Fund of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

2684.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that persons who are primarily engaged in sewing or assembly of garments for other persons engaged in garment manufacturing frequently close down their sewing shops to avoid paying their employees’ wages and subsequently reopen under the conditions described in subdivision (b), and are more likely to do so than are other types of persons engaged in garment manufacturing.

(b) A successor to any employer that is primarily engaged in sewing or assembly of garments for other persons engaged in the business of garment manufacturing, as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 2671, that owes wages to the predecessor’s former employee or employees is liable for those wages if the successor meets any of the following criteria:

(1) Uses substantially the same facilities or work force to produce substantially the same products for substantially the same type of customers as the predecessor employer.

(2) Shares in the ownership, management, control of labor relations, or interrelations of business operations with the predecessor employer.

(3) Has in its employ in a managerial capacity any person who directly or indirectly controlled the wages, hours, or working conditions of the affected employees of the predecessor employer.

(4) Is an immediate family member of any owner, partner, officer, or director of the predecessor employer or of any person who had a financial interest in the predecessor employer.

This section does not impose liability upon a successor for the guarantee of unpaid minimum wages and overtime compensation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 2673.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 554, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Arbitration [2685. - 2692.]

2685.

The commissioner shall establish, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, procedures for mandatory arbitration of pricing and product quality disputes arising out of written contracts between manufacturers and contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

2686.

Upon the written request of any manufacturer or contractor, the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall notify the other party to the dispute of the request for arbitration and shall, within seven days of receipt of the request, appoint an arbitration panel to hear and render a decision regarding the dispute. The panel shall be constituted as follows:

(a) A management level representative from a manufacturer in the general geographic area in which the dispute arises, provided that insofar as possible the manufacturer shall not be a direct competitor of the manufacturer involved in the dispute to be arbitrated. This panel member also shall be selected in accordance with the terms of the
 written contract.

(b) A representative from the contractors’ association whose membership encompasses the general geographic area in which the dispute arises. This panel member also shall be selected in accordance with the terms of the written contract.

(c) A third party to be chosen and agreed upon by the first two parties to the dispute from a list of arbitrators provided by the American Arbitration Association. This party shall act as chairperson of the panel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 99.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2687.

Within seven days of appointment, the chairperson of the panel shall notify the parties in writing of the date, time, and location of the hearing before the panel. The hearing date shall be scheduled no later than 21 days after the filing of the request for arbitration, provided, however, that each party shall have no less than five days notice prior to the hearing date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

2688.

On the date and time specified in the hearing notice, the chairperson shall convene the hearing and shall determine whether each party is represented. If neither party is represented, the arbitration shall be terminated, with costs assigned to the party requesting arbitration, and the parties shall forfeit any further rights under this section relating to the dispute for which arbitration was requested. In the event only one party is in attendance, the arbitration shall proceed and the panel shall make its award based upon the evidence presented. Appearance at the hearing by a party shall be deemed to waive any alleged defect in notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

2689.

To facilitate the conduct of the hearing, the following procedures shall govern:

(a) Upon good cause shown by a party, the chairperson shall be empowered to issue subpoenae duces tecum and ad testificandum.

(b) Each party may be represented by an attorney at the party’s own expense. 

(c) The formal rules of evidence shall not be applicable, but any relevant evidence shall be admitted if it is evidence upon which responsible persons would rely in the conduct of serious business affairs.

(d) All testimony shall be taken under oath.

(e) No formal written records shall be kept unless one or both parties agree to employ at their own expense a qualified court reporter for that purpose. In such case, a copy of the record shall be provided to the panel and a copy shall be made available to the other party at the standard cost for such additional copies.

(f) Those in attendance at the hearing shall be limited to the panel, the parties and their counsel, a court reporter, interpreters when requested by a party or the panel, and witnesses while testifying.

(g) Upon the request of a panel member, the panel may allow a period, not to exceed three days following the conclusion of the hearing, during which time a party may submit otherwise admissible evidence not available during the course of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

2690.

Within 15 days after the conclusion of the hearing, the panel shall make a written award, which shall determine all questions submitted for arbitration. All decisions of the panel shall be by majority vote and the award shall be signed by the members concurring therein. The panel immediately shall provide written notice of the award to the parties and to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

2691.

Within 10 days of receipt of notice of the award, the party or parties who are required to comply with the terms of the award shall so comply and file proof of such compliance with the commissioner or shall file a notice of appeal with the superior court for the county in which the hearing was held. Upon the filing of such an appeal, a trial de novo shall be held, provided, however, that the decision reached by the panel as stated in the award shall be received as evidence by the trial court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 525.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2692.

The basic costs of the arbitration proceeding, including interpreters requested by the panel, shall be borne equally by all parties to the proceeding, provided, however, that the panel may as a part of its award impose all such costs on the party requesting arbitration if a majority of the panel determines that the matter brought before it was frivolous. In addition, in the case of a frivolous claim the panel may impose upon the party requesting arbitration the costs of translators, court reporters, and reasonable attorneys fees incurred by the other party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Garment worker wage claim pilot program [2693. - 2693.1.]

2693.

The Legislature finds and declares that the garment industry is rife with both egregious wage violations and flagrant health and safety violations, both of which have been allowed to proliferate in the pandemic, leading to the deaths of dozens of garment workers. However, not all workers who experience these violations have access to advocates in order to vindicate their rights, due to the limited capacity of legal aid and community-based organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 78, Sec. 5.   (AB 138)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2693.1.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the Department of Industrial Relations shall establish and maintain a Garment Worker Wage Claim Pilot Program. The Department shall contract to provide resources to qualified organizations. The funds shall be used to increase the capacity and expertise of qualified organizations to improve the education of wage violations to garment workers and the securing of wage claims for garment workers who bring forward a wage claim pursuant to Section 2673.1. The program shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Education for garment workers including, but not limited to, minimum wage, overtime, sick leave, recordkeeping, wage adjudication, and retaliation.

(2) Direct assistance by a worker advocate to assist workers who seek to file a wage claim.

(3) Legal assistance to garment workers who seek to file a wage claim.

(b) All education and services provided in this section shall be at free and accessible to any garment worker in the State of California.

(c) For the purposes of this chapter, “qualified organization” means a legal aid or community-based nonprofit organization that has a minimum of five years experience working with garment workers, advocating on behalf of garment workers, and a successful record of winning wage claims on behalf of garment workers that have been filed with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 78, Sec. 5.   (AB 138)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 12. SHEEPHERDERS AND GOAT HERDERS [2695.1. - 2695.4.]

2695.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to codify certain labor protections that should be afforded to sheepherders. The provisions of this section are in addition to, and are entirely independent from, any other statutory or legal protections, rights, or remedies that are or may be available under this code or any other state law or regulation to sheepherders either as individuals, employees, or persons.

(b) All terms used in this section and in Section 2695.2 have the meanings assigned to them by this code or any other state law or regulation.

(c) The Department of Industrial Relations shall update Wage Order No. 14-2001 to be consistent with this section and Sections 2695.2, 2695.3, and 2695.4, except that any
 existing provision in Wage Order No. 14-2001 that provides greater protections or benefits to sheepherders or goat herders shall continue in full force and effect, notwithstanding any provision of this section, Section 2695.2, Section 2695.3, or Section 2695.4.

(d) For purposes of this section and Section 2695.2, “sheepherder” means an individual who is employed to do any of the following, including with the use of trained dogs:

(1) Tend herds of sheep grazing or browsing on range or pasture.

(2) Move sheep to and about an area assigned for grazing or browsing.

(3) Prevent sheep from wandering or becoming lost.

 (4) Protect sheep against predators and the eating of poisonous plants.

 (5) Assist in the lambing, docking, or shearing of sheep.

 (6) Provide water or feed supplementary rations to sheep.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 41.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2695.2.

(a) (1) For a sheepherder employed on a regularly scheduled 24-hour shift on a seven-day-a-week “on-call” basis, an employer may, as an alternative to paying the minimum wage for all hours worked, instead pay no less than the monthly minimum wage adopted by the Industrial Welfare Commission on April 24, 2001. Any sheepherder who performs nonsheepherding work on any workday shall be fully covered for that workweek by the provisions of any applicable laws or regulations relating to that work.

(2) After July 1, 2002, the amount of the monthly minimum wage permitted under paragraph (1) shall be increased each time that the state minimum wage is increased and shall become effective on the same date as any increase in the state minimum wage. The amount of the increase shall be determined by calculating the percentage increase of the new rate over the previous rate, and then by applying the same percentage increase to the minimum monthly wage rate.

(3) An employer shall not credit meals or lodging against the minimum wage owed to sheepherders under this subdivision. Every employer shall provide to each sheepherder not less than the minimum monthly meal and lodging benefits required to be provided by employers of sheepherders under the provisions of the H-2A visa program of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Section 1101, et seq.) or any successor provisions.

(b) (1) When tools or equipment are required by the employer or are necessary to the performance of a job, the tools and equipment shall be provided and maintained by the employer, except that a sheepherder whose wages are at least two times the minimum wage provided herein, or if paid on a monthly basis, at least two times the monthly minimum wage, may be required to provide and maintain handtools and equipment customarily required by the trade or
 craft.

(2) A reasonable deposit may be required as security for the return of the items furnished by the employer under provisions of paragraph (1) upon issuance of a receipt to the sheepherder for the deposit. The deposits shall be made pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 400) of Chapter 3. Alternatively, with the prior written authorization of the sheepherder, an employer may deduct from the sheepherder’s last check the cost of any item furnished pursuant to paragraph (1) when the item is not returned. No deduction shall be made at any time for normal wear and tear. All items furnished by the employer shall be returned by the sheepherder upon completion of the job.

(c) No employer of sheepherders shall employ a sheepherder for a work period of more than five hours without a meal period of no less than 30 minutes, except that when a work period of not more than six
 hours will complete a day’s work, the meal period may be waived by the mutual consent of the employer and the sheepherder. An employer may be relieved of this obligation if a meal period of 30 minutes cannot reasonably be provided because no one is available to relieve a sheepherder tending flock alone on that day. Where a meal period of 30 minutes can be provided but not without interruption, a sheepherder shall be allowed to complete the meal period during that day.

(d) To the extent practicable, every employer shall authorize and permit all sheepherders to take rest periods. The rest period, insofar as is practicable, shall be in the middle of each work period. The authorized rest times shall be based on the total hours worked daily at the rate of 10 minutes net rest time per four hours, or major fraction thereof, of work. However, a rest period need not be authorized for sheepherders whose total daily worktime is less than three and
 one-half hours.

(e) When the nature of the work reasonably permits the use of seats, suitable seats shall be provided for sheepherders working on or at a machine.

(f) After January 1, 2003, during times when a sheepherder is lodged in mobile housing units where it is feasible to provide lodging that meets the minimum standards established by this section because there is practicable access for mobile housing units, the lodging provided shall include at a minimum all of the following:

(1) Toilets and bathing facilities, which may include portable toilets and portable shower facilities.

(2) Heating.

(3) Inside lighting.

(4) Potable hot and cold water.

(5) Adequate cooking facilities and utensils.

(6) A working refrigerator, which may include a butane or propane gas refrigerator, or for no more than a one-week period during which a nonworking refrigerator is repaired or replaced, a means of refrigerating perishable food items, which may include ice chests, provided that ice is delivered to the sheepherder, as needed, to maintain a continuous temperature required to retard spoilage and ensure food safety.

(g) After January 1, 2003, all sheepherders shall be provided with all of the following at each worksite:

(1) Regular mail service.

(2) A means of communication through telephone or radio
 solely for use in a medical emergency affecting the sheepherder or for an emergency relating to the herding operation. If the means of communication is provided by telephone, the sheepherder may be charged for the actual cost of nonemergency telephone use. Nothing in this paragraph shall preclude an employer from providing additional means of communication to the sheepherder which are appropriate because telephones or radios are out of range or otherwise inoperable.

(3) Visitor access to the housing.

(4) Upon request and to the extent practicable, access to transportation to and from the nearest locale where shopping, medical, or cultural facilities and services are available on a weekly basis.

(h) In addition to any other civil penalties provided by law, any employer or any other person acting on behalf of the employer who violates or causes to be violated the provisions of this section shall be subject to a
 civil penalty, as follows:

(1) For the initial violation, one hundred dollars ($100) for each underpaid employee for each pay period during which the employee was underpaid, plus an amount sufficient to recover the unpaid wages.

(2) For any subsequent violation, two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) for each underpaid employee for each pay period during which the employee was underpaid, plus an amount sufficient to recover the unpaid wages.

(3) The affected employee shall receive payment of all wages recovered.

(i) If the application of any provision of any subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, word, or portion of this legislation is held invalid, unconstitutional, unauthorized, or prohibited by statute, the remaining provisions thereof shall not be affected and shall continue to be given full force and effect as if the part held invalid or unconstitutional had not been included.

(j) Every employer of sheepherders shall post a copy of
 this part in an area frequented by sheepherders where it may be easily read during the workday. Where the location of work or other conditions make posting impractical, every employer shall make a copy of this part available to sheepherders upon request. Copies of this part shall be posted and made available in a language understood by the sheepherder. An employer is deemed to have complied with this subdivision if the employer posts where practical, or makes available upon request where posting is impractical, a copy of the Industrial Welfare Commission Order 14-2001, updated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2695.1, relating to sheepherders, provided that the posted material includes a sufficient summary of each of the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 42.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2695.4.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to codify certain labor protections that should be afforded to goat herders. The provisions of this section are in addition to, and are entirely independent from, any other statutory or legal protections, rights, or remedies that are or may be available under this code or any other state law or regulation to goat herders either as individuals, employees, or persons.

(b) (1) For a goat herder employed on a regularly scheduled 24-hour shift on a seven-days-per-week “on-call” basis, an employer may, as an alternative to paying the minimum wage for all hours worked, instead pay no less than the monthly minimum wage specified in Section 4(E) of Wage Order No. 14-2001 of the Industrial
 Welfare Commission. Any goat herder who performs non-goat-herding work on any workday shall be fully covered for that workweek by the provisions of any applicable laws or regulations relating to that work.

(2) The amount of the monthly minimum wage permitted under paragraph (1) shall be increased each time that the state minimum wage is increased and shall become effective on the same date as any increase in the state minimum wage. The amount of the increase shall be determined by calculating the percentage increase of the new rate over the previous rate, and then by applying the same percentage increase to the minimum monthly wage rate.

(3) An employer shall not credit meals or lodging against the minimum wage owed to goat herders under this subdivision. Every employer shall provide to each goat herder not less than the minimum monthly meal and lodging benefits required to be
 provided by employers of goat herders under the provisions of the H-2A visa program of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101) or any successor provisions.

(c) (1) When tools or equipment are required by the employer or are necessary to the performance of a job, the tools and equipment shall be provided and maintained by the employer, except that a goat herder whose wages are at least two times the minimum wage provided herein, or if paid on a monthly basis, at least two times the monthly minimum wage, may be required to provide and maintain hand tools and equipment customarily required by the trade or craft.

(2) A reasonable deposit may be required as security for the return of the items furnished by the employer under provisions of paragraph (1) upon issuance of a receipt to the goat herder for the deposit. The deposits shall be
 made pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 400) of Chapter 3 of Part 1. Alternatively, with the prior written authorization of the goat herder, an employer may deduct from the goat herder’s last check the cost of any item furnished pursuant to paragraph (1) when the item is not returned. No deduction shall be made at any time for normal wear and tear. All items furnished by the employer shall be returned by the goat herder upon completion of the job.

(d) No employer of goat herders shall employ a goat herder for a work period of more than five hours without a meal period of no less than 30 minutes, except that when a work period of not more than six hours will complete a day’s work, the meal period may be waived by the mutual consent of the employer and the goat herder. An employer may be relieved of this obligation if a meal period of 30 minutes cannot reasonably be provided because no one is available to relieve a goat herder tending
 flock alone on that day. Where a meal period of 30 minutes can be provided but not without interruption, a goat herder shall be allowed to complete the meal period during that day.

(e) To the extent practicable, every employer shall authorize and permit all goat herders to take rest periods. The rest period, insofar as is practicable, shall be in the middle of each work period. The authorized rest times shall be based on the total hours worked daily at the rate of 10 minutes net rest time per four hours, or major fraction thereof, of work. However, a rest period need not be authorized for goat herders whose total daily worktime is less than three and one-half hours.

(f) When the nature of the work reasonably permits the use of seats, suitable seats shall be provided for goat herders working on or at a machine.

(g) During times when a goat herder is lodged in mobile housing units where it is feasible to provide lodging that meets the minimum standards established by this section because there is practicable access for mobile housing units, the lodging provided shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Toilets and bathing facilities, which may include portable toilets and portable shower facilities.

(2) Heating.

(3) Inside lighting.

(4) Potable hot and cold water.

(5) Adequate cooking facilities and utensils.

(6) A working refrigerator, which may include a butane or propane gas refrigerator, or for no more
 than a one-week period during which a nonworking refrigerator is repaired or replaced, a means of refrigerating perishable food items, which may include ice chests, provided that ice is delivered to the goat herder, as needed, to maintain a continuous temperature required to retard spoilage and ensure food safety.

(h) All goat herders shall be provided with all of the following at each worksite:

(1) Regular mail service.

(2) (A) A means of communication through telephone or radio solely for use in a medical emergency affecting the goat herder or for an emergency relating to the herding operation. If the means of communication is provided by telephone, the goat herder may be charged for the actual cost of nonemergency telephone use, except where prohibited by Section 2802.

(B) This paragraph does not preclude an employer from providing additional means of communication to the goat herder which are appropriate because telephones or radios are out of range or otherwise inoperable.

(3) Visitor access to the housing.

(4) Upon request, and to the extent practicable, access to transportation to and from the nearest locale where shopping, medical, or cultural facilities and services are available on a weekly basis.

(i) In addition to any other civil penalties provided by law, any employer or any other person acting on behalf of the employer who violates or causes to be violated the provisions of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty, as follows:

(1) For the
 initial violation, one hundred dollars ($100) for each underpaid employee for each pay period during which the employee was underpaid, plus an amount sufficient to recover the unpaid wages.

(2) For any subsequent violation, two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each underpaid employee for each pay period during which the employee was underpaid, plus an amount sufficient to recover the unpaid wages.

(3) The affected employee shall receive payment of all wages recovered.

(j) If the application of any provision of any subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, word, or portion of this section is held invalid, unconstitutional, unauthorized, or prohibited by statute, the remaining provisions thereof shall not be affected and shall continue to be given full force and effect as if the part held invalid or unconstitutional had
 not been included.

(k) Every employer of goat herders shall post a copy of this part in an area frequented by goat herders where it may be easily read during the workday. Where the location of work or other conditions make posting impractical, every employer shall make a copy of this part available to goat herders upon request. Copies of this part shall be posted and made available in a language understood by the goat herder. An employer is deemed to have complied with this subdivision if the employer posts where practical, or makes available upon request where posting is impractical, a copy of the Wage Order No. 14-2001 of the Industrial Welfare Commission, updated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2695.1, relating to goat herders, provided that the posted material includes a sufficient summary of each of the provisions of this part.

(l) For purposes of this section, “goat
 herder” means an individual who is employed to do any of the following, including with the use of trained dogs:

(1) Tend herds of goats grazing or browsing on range or pasture.

(2) Move goats to and about an area assigned for grazing or browsing.

(3) Prevent goats from wandering or becoming lost.

(4) Protect goats against predators and the eating of poisonous plants.

(5) Assist in the kidding of goats.

(6) Provide water or feed supplementary rations to goats.

(m) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 256, Sec. 7.   (AB 187)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 13. THE LABOR CODE PRIVATE ATTORNEYS GENERAL ACT OF 2004 [2698. - 2699.8.]

2698.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Labor Code Private Attorneys General Act of 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 906, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2699.
